California statutes. Public Resources Code
-------------------------------------------

30949.

No more than 50 percent of the funds made available to the board for the purposes of this article shall be used for the purposes of Section 30948.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 727, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Small Community Groundwater Grant Program [30950. - 30950.]

30950.

(a) For the purposes of this article, “small community” means a municipality with a population of 20,000 persons or less, a rural county, or a reasonably isolated and divisible segment of a larger municipality where the segment of the population is 20,000 persons or less, with a financial hardship, as determined by the board.

(b) The board may award grants under this article to assist small communities in complying with groundwater contaminant level requirements.

(c) The board may award grants under this article to local public agencies and private not-for-profit water companies.

(d) The board shall give priority to the following types of projects:

(1) Projects to provide an alternate source of water or to treat water where the existing supply of groundwater exceeds the maximum contaminant level of arsenic.

(2) Projects to provide an alternate source of water or to treat water where the existing supply of groundwater exceeds the maximum contaminant level for nitrate.

(3) Projects identified by the board, in consultation with the State Department of Health Services, as having a priority to address the needs of small community water systems.

(e) The board may make funds available under this article in each fiscal year to provide technical assistance or planning grants, or both, to small communities.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 727) by Stats. 2003, Ch. 493, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 20.5. OCEAN USE PLANNING [30960. - 30960.]

30960.

The Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency shall initiate a comprehensive, long-range planning process for the use of ocean waters offshore of California, may use the advisory panel appointed pursuant to Section 6231 as the planning committee, and may use the California Sea Grant Program to promote sound scientific data analysis and assessment in this planning process.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 561, Sec. 207.   (AB 1516)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 20.6.5. CALIFORNIA SEA LEVEL RISE MITIGATION AND ADAPTATION ACT OF 2021 [30970. - 30973.]

30970.

This division shall be known, and may be cited, as the California Sea Level Rise Mitigation and Adaptation Act of 2021.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 236, Sec. 5.   (SB 1)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

30971.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) California has 1,264 miles of coastline, and, if small bays and inlets are included, it has up to 3,000 miles of coastline located on the western seaboard of the United States, all of which is prone to the severe and pervasive effects of sea level rise.

(b) According to the “State of California Sea-Level Rise Guidance Document” issued by the Natural Resources Agency and the Ocean Protection Council, the impacts of sea level rise on the state will be significant and pervasive, and could occur as soon as within the next decade.

(c) (1) As with most impacts from climate change, the impacts of sea level rise are both environmental and economic, including losses to publicly owned infrastructure, such as airports, rail lines, streets and highways, pipelines, waste water treatment plants, schools, hospitals, and other facilities.

(2) For example, the catastrophic inundation, flooding, and property damage from a small rise in sea level, combined with a 1-in-10 likelihood of a Pacific storm, could amount to tens of billions of dollars in uninsured losses of structures and properties.

(3) A 2015 assessment by the Risky Business Project, led by former United States Secretary of the Treasury Henry Paulson and other business leaders, found that between eight billion dollars
 ($8,000,000,000) and ten billion dollars ($10,000,000,000) of existing property in the state is likely to be underwater by the year 2050 if current trends continue.

(4) According to the 2015 National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration report, The National Significance of California’s Coastal Economy, “California’s 19 coastal counties generated $662 billion in wages and $1.7 trillion in GDP in 2012” and “California’s ocean-related activities represent a substantial portion of the U.S. ocean economy as a whole—13 percent of the establishments, 14 percent of the employment and wages, and 12 percent of the GDP in 2012,” all of which would be adversely affected by sea level rise.

(5) Recent reports in periodicals, such as the Los Angeles Times, state succinctly that “Destruction
 from sea level rise in California could exceed worst wildfires and earthquakes.”

(d) For the economy, the natural environment, and the people of California, it is urgent that the state enact new statutes to plan for, anticipate, and respond to sea level rise.

(e) The purpose of this division is to establish new planning, assessment, funding, and mitigation tools for California to address and respond to sea level rise.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 236, Sec. 5.   (SB 1)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

30972.

(a) (1) There is hereby created within the Ocean Protection Council the California Sea Level Rise State and Regional Support Collaborative.

(2) In its role as the collaborative, the Ocean Protection Council shall coordinate with the other state planning and coastal management agencies, including, but not limited to, the Office of Planning and Research, the Strategic Growth Council, the State Lands Commission, the California Coastal Commission, the State Coastal Conservancy, and the San Francisco Bay Conservation and Development Commission, to administer the grants and
 on the kind of information and support it provides local, regional, and other state agencies consistent with their statutory authority.

(b) The collaborative shall provide state and regional information to the public and support to local, regional, and other state agencies for the identification, assessment, planning, and, where feasible, the mitigation of the adverse environmental, social, and economic effects of sea level rise within the coastal zone and the area under the jurisdiction of the San Francisco Bay Conservation and Development Commission, pursuant to Section 66610 of the Government Code. The support the collaborative provides to local and regional agencies shall include, but not be limited to, technical assistance on updating local and regional land use plans
 to take into account sea level rise.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 236, Sec. 5.   (SB 1)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

30973.

(a) Upon appropriation by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act, the collaborative shall expend not more than one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) annually from appropriate bond funds and other sources for the purposes of making grants to local and regional governments to update local and regional land use plans to take into account sea level rise, and for directly related investments to implement those plans. Priority shall be given to those local and regional governments that have agreed most effectively and urgently to plan
 for and implement actions to address sea level rise.

(b) As part of the adoption of the annual Budget Act, the Secretary of Environmental Protection and the Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency shall annually appear before the budget
 committees of both houses of the Legislature regarding the implementation of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 236, Sec. 5.   (SB 1)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 20.6.9. SEA LEVEL RISE PLANNING AND ADAPTATION [30985. - 30985.8.]

30985.

(a) A local government lying, in whole or in part, within the coastal zone or within the jurisdiction of the San Francisco Bay Conservation and Development Commission shall develop a sea level rise plan as part of either of the following, as applicable:

(1) A local coastal program that is subject to approval by the California Coastal Commission consistent with the guidelines established pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 30985.2.

(2) A subregional San Francisco Bay shoreline resiliency plan that is subject to approval by the San Francisco Bay Conservation and Development Commission consistent with the guidelines established
 pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 30985.2.

(b) The sea level rise plan required pursuant to subdivision (a) shall include, at a minimum, all of the following:

(1) The use of the best available science.

(2) A vulnerability assessment that includes efforts to ensure equity for at-risk communities.

(3) Sea level rise adaptation strategies and recommended projects.

(4) Identification of lead planning and implementation agencies.

(5) A timeline for updates, as needed, based on conditions and projections and as determined by the local government in
 agreement with the California Coastal Commission or the San Francisco Bay Conservation and Development Commission, as
 applicable.

(c) A timeline for sea level rise plan updates, as required pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (b), shall include economic impact analyses of, at a minimum, costs to critical public infrastructure and recommended approaches for implementing the sea level rise adaptation strategies and recommended projects pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b).

(d) All local governments subject to the requirements of subdivision (a) shall comply with this section by January 1, 2034.

(e) For purposes of this section, “critical public infrastructure” includes, but is not limited to, transit, roads, airports, ports, water storage, and conveyance, wastewater treatment facilities, landfills, powerplants, and
 railroads.

(f) The California Coastal Commission or the San Francisco Bay Conservation and Development Commission may deem existing sea level rise information or sea level rise plans prepared by a local government to satisfy one or all of the requirements of subdivisions (b) and (c).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 286, Sec. 1.   (AB 996)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Conditionally operative pursuant to Section 30985.6.)
-------------------------------------------

30985.2.

(a) On or before December 31, 2024, the California Coastal Commission, in close coordination with the Ocean Protection Council and the California Sea Level Rise State and Regional Support Collaborative, shall establish guidelines for the preparation of the sea level rise plan required pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 30985. The guidelines shall recognize and build upon the baseline policies as described in the “Sea Level Rise Working Group: 2021 Work Products” as published by the California Coastal Commission on December 3, 2021.

(b) On or before December 31, 2024, the San Francisco Bay Conservation and Development Commission, in close coordination with the California Coastal Commission, the Ocean Protection Council, and the California Sea Level Rise State and Regional Support Collaborative, shall establish guidelines for the preparation of the sea level rise plan required pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 30985. The guidelines shall recognize and build upon the “guiding principles of the joint platform” as described on page 16 of the “Bay Adapt Regional Strategy for a Rising Bay Joint Platform” adopted by the San Francisco Bay Conservation and Development Commission on
 October 21, 2021.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 384, Sec. 2.   (SB 272)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Conditionally operative pursuant to Section 30985.6.)
-------------------------------------------

30985.4.

This division does not reduce, alter, or diminish the authority of a state or local agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 384, Sec. 2.   (SB 272)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Conditionally operative pursuant to Section 30985.6.)
-------------------------------------------

30985.5.

Local governments that receive approval by the California Coastal Commission or the San Francisco Bay Conservation and Development Commission, as applicable, pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 30985 shall be prioritized for funding, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for the implementation of sea level rise adaptation strategies and recommended projects in the local government’s approved sea level rise
 plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 384, Sec. 2.   (SB 272)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Conditionally operative pursuant to Section 30985.6.)
-------------------------------------------

30985.6.

The operation of this division is contingent upon an appropriation for its purposes by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act or another statute.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 384, Sec. 2.   (SB 272)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

30985.7.

(a) A local government is encouraged to consult with the California Coastal Commission, on or before January 1, 2029, in preparation of a local coastal program or an amendment to a local coastal program pursuant to this division to ensure that, upon formal submission of the local coastal program or an amendment to the local coastal program to the California Coastal Commission, the materials are sufficient for a thorough and complete review. 

(b) A local government’s participation in an early consultation pursuant to this section is voluntary. An early consultation is intended to help a local government to timely meet the requirements of this division. Participation in
 an early consultation at any time shall not prevent a local government from submitting a sea level rise plan as required by this division. 

(c) If a local government seeks to engage in an early consultation at any time with the California Coastal Commission, the following shall occur: 

(1) A local government shall initiate the early consultation by notifying California Coastal Commission staff in writing that the local government seeks to engage in a consultation. After providing this notification, the local government shall provide the California Coastal Commission a summary report on the status of its efforts to develop a sea level rise plan pursuant to Section 30985, including any draft components as outlined in subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 30985, and may provide a
 draft local coastal program or an amendment to a local coastal program that is intended to satisfy the requirement of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 30985.

(2) An early consultation may include a singular meeting or regular meetings. The meeting schedule shall be mutually agreed upon by the local government and the California Coastal Commission.

(3) California Coastal Commission staff shall offer written recommendations to a local government about what may preclude certification of a local coastal program or an amendment to a local coastal program, including, but not limited to, information about what satisfies the requirements of subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 30985.

(4) California Coastal
 Commission staff shall provide recommendations in a reasonable timeframe that is mutually agreed upon by both the local government and the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 286, Sec. 2.   (AB 996)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Conditionally operative pursuant to Section 30985.6.)
-------------------------------------------

30985.8.

For purposes of this division, the following definitions apply:

(a) “California Sea Level Rise State and Regional Support Collaborative” means the California Sea Level Rise State and Regional Support Collaborative created pursuant to Section 30972.

(b) “Coastal zone” has the same meaning as defined in Section 30103.

(c) “Jurisdiction of the San Francisco Bay Conservation and Development Commission” means the area described in Section 66610 of the Government Code.

(d) “Local coastal program” has the
 same meaning as defined in Section 30108.6.

(e) “Local government” has the same meaning as defined in Section 30109.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 384, Sec. 2.   (SB 272)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Conditionally operative pursuant to Section 30985.6.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 20.7. SANTA MONICA BAY RESTORATION [30988. - 30988.3.]

30988.

(a)The Legislature finds and declares that Santa Monica Bay is a public trust for present and future generations of Californians, and an invaluable element in the ecosystem of southern California.

(b) The biological health and recreational resources of Santa Monica Bay are threatened by the historical accumulation of DDT, PCBs and other toxic pollutants, pathogens, nutrients, stormwater and urban runoff, nonpoint pollutant sources, oil spills, and industrial discharges, increasing with population pressures in the region.

(c) Santa Monica Bay’s Palos Verdes Shelf has been identified as a federal Superfund site, and designated under the United States Environmental Protection Agency’s National Estuary Program. Since 1988, the United States Environmental Protection Agency has designated the former Santa Monica Bay Restoration Project as an agency to plan for the Santa Monica Bay’s restoration, and to oversee implementation of the Santa Monica Bay Restoration Plan. The State of California has expended millions of dollars for the administration of the Santa Monica Bay Restoration Project, and the Safe Neighborhood Parks, Clean Water, Clean Air, and Coastal Protection Bond Act of 2000 (the Villaraigosa-Keeley Act; Chapter 1.692 (commencing with Section 5096.300) of Division 5 of the Public Resources Code) earmarks up to twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) for Santa Monica Bay restoration projects, as identified by the former Santa Monica Bay Restoration Project.

(d) It is the intent of the Legislature that the Santa Monica Bay Restoration Commission be a nonregulatory, locally based state government entity that will monitor, assess, coordinate, and advise all state programs, and oversee funding that affects the beneficial uses, restoration, and enhancement of Santa Monica Bay and its watershed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 598, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

30988.2.

(a) The Santa Monica Bay Restoration Project is hereby renamed the Santa Monica Bay Restoration Commission. The commission shall independently execute the duties described in this section, and the State Water Resources Control Board shall provide administrative services to the commission. Any reference in any statute to the Santa Monica Bay Restoration Project shall be deemed to be a reference to the Santa Monica Bay Restoration Commission.

(b) (1) The Secretary for Environmental Protection, the Secretary of the Resources Agency, and the Chair of the Bay Watershed Council of the Santa Monica Bay Restoration Commission shall enter into a memorandum of understanding that ensures the coordination of state programs affecting Santa Monica Bay, and that delineates the authority of that commission, and its governance structure with respect to the implementation of those state programs. The commission membership shall be prescribed in the memorandum of understanding, and shall include federal, state, and local public agency officials and employees, and representatives of other stakeholder interests.

(c) The commission may do all of the following:

(1) Request and receive federal, state, local, and private funds from any source, and expend those moneys for the restoration and enhancement of Santa Monica Bay and its watershed.

(2) Award and administer grants for the restoration and enhancement of Santa Monica Bay and its watershed.

(3) Enter into contracts and joint powers authority agreements, as necessary, to carry out the purposes of the commission.

(4) Monitor, assess, and coordinate activities among federal, state, and local agencies and, where appropriate, private firms, to restore and enhance Santa Monica Bay and its watershed.

(d) (1) The Santa Monica Bay Restoration Account is hereby created in the State Treasury, and moneys in the account may be expended, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to support the activities of the Santa Monica Bay Restoration Commission.

(2) The balance of any funds previously appropriated by the Legislature, prior to January 1, 2003, from the General Fund or from bond proceeds to support the activities of the former Santa Monica Bay Restoration Project shall be transferred into the account.

(3) (A) Funds transferred to the account that are derived from an appropriation from the General Fund are available for expenditure only for the duration originally authorized and only for a purpose authorized by this division as it read on December 31, 2002.

(B) Funds transferred to the account that are derived from an appropriation of bond proceeds are available for expenditure only for the duration originally authorized and may be expended for any purpose authorized by this division on and after January 1, 2003.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 598, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

30988.3.

The Santa Monica Bay Restoration Commission shall prioritize in its educational, monitoring, and bond proceeds expenditure decisions, proposals, or projects designed to achieve bay restoration objectives including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(a) The reduction or elimination of stormwater, urban runoff, and point and nonpoint source pollution.

(b) The reduction or prevention of the threat of oil and sewage spills and leaks.

(c) The reduction and prevention of beach erosion.

(d) The reduction and prevention of public health threats from pollution.

(e) The prevention and restoration of, and protection against, loss of wetlands, coastal and riparian habitats, and Santa Monica Bay’s natural and living resources.

(f) Effective enforcement of appropriate environmental laws.

(g) Public education and warnings of any dangers of consuming contaminated seafood.

(h) Increased public education concerning the Santa Monica Bay in collaboration with universities and grades K-12 schools.

(i) Assuring that ocean resources are accessible to all Californians regardless of socioeconomic status, and are preserved and enhanced for future generations.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 30988.4 by Stats. 2002, Ch. 598, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 21. STATE COASTAL CONSERVANCY [31000. - 31414.]



CHAPTER 1. General Provisions and Definitions [31000. - 31017.]

31000.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this chapter govern the construction of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1441.)
-------------------------------------------

31001.

“Certified local coastal plan or program” means any plan or program or land use plan of a local program adopted by the commission pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 30500) of Division 20.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 807.)
-------------------------------------------

31002.

“Conservancy” means the State Coastal Conservancy.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1441.)
-------------------------------------------

31004.

“Commission” means the California Coastal Commission established under Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 30300) of Division 20.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1441.)
-------------------------------------------

31005.

“Bay commission” means the San Francisco Bay Conservation and Development Commission, established under Title 7.2 (commencing with Section 66600) of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 967, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

31006.

(a) “Coastal zone” means that area of the state as defined in Section 30103. Only for purposes of conservancy action in San Francisco Bay, the “coastal zone” also includes areas that are within the permit jurisdiction of the bay commission, as described in Section 66610 of the Government Code, with the exception of Contra Costa County lands from the Richmond-San Rafael Bridge north and east to the termination of the bay commission boundary, except as provided in subdivision (b), as well as any uplands, wetlands, marshes, diked lands, and other watershed lands that significantly affect the environmental quality of the bay or are directly related to the public’s use and enjoyment of the bay, and other watershed lands within the nine counties adjacent to the bay that have waters that flow directly into the bay or the ocean.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), with respect to lands within Contra Costa County that are included within the permit jurisdiction of the bay commission, as described in Section 66610 of the Government Code, or that consist of any uplands, wetlands, marshes, diked lands, or other watershed lands that significantly affect the environmental quality of the bay or are directly related to the public’s use and enjoyment of the bay, the local public agency having jurisdiction over any such lands may formally request conservancy action by resolution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 896, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

31007.

“Coastal restoration project” means an action taken by a public agency, including the conservancy, or a nonprofit organization, to correct undesirable development patterns in the coastal zone.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 958, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

31008.

“Coastal resource enhancement project” means an action taken by a public agency, including the conservancy, or a nonprofit organization, to restore, as nearly as possible, degraded natural areas to their original condition or to enhance the resource values of a coastal zone.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 958, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

31009.

“Department” means the Department of Parks and Recreation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1441.)
-------------------------------------------

31010.

“Local public agency” includes, but is not limited to, a city, county, city and county, district, association of governments, or joint powers agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 958, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

31011.

Any funds received by the department pursuant to this division shall be deposited in the State Parks and Recreation Fund. Unless otherwise provided in this division, any funds received by the conservancy pursuant to this division shall be deposited in the State Coastal Conservancy Fund. The conservancy and the Controller shall establish separate accounts within the State Coastal Conservancy Fund for the purpose of separating deposits into the fund according to their origin.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1551, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

31012.

(a) The Coastal Trust Fund is hereby established in the State Treasury, to receive and disburse funds paid to the conservancy in trust, subject to the right of recovery to fulfill the purposes of the trust, as provided in this section.

(b) (1) There is in the Coastal Trust Fund the San Francisco Bay Area Conservancy Program Account, which shall be expended solely for the purposes of Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 31160).

(2) The conservancy shall deposit in the San Francisco Bay Area Conservancy Program Account all funds received by the conservancy for the purposes of the San Francisco Bay
 Area Conservancy Program established under Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 31160), from sources other than the state or federal government and not provided for in subdivision (a) of Section 31164. These funds include, but are not limited to, private donations, fees, penalties, and local government contributions.

(c) (1) There is in the Coastal Trust Fund the Coastal Program Account. Funds in the Coastal Program Account shall be expended solely for their specified trust purposes.

(2) Upon approval of the Department of Finance, the conservancy shall deposit in the Coastal Program Account all funds paid to the conservancy in trust for purposes of this division, except those funds identified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b). The funds that shall be deposited in the Coastal Program Account, upon that approval, include, but are not limited to, funds that
 are paid to the conservancy in trust for purposes of mitigation, for settlement of litigation, instead of other conditions of coastal development permits or other regulatory entitlements, or for other trust purposes consistent with this division and specified by the terms of a gift or contract. Funds in the Coastal Program Account shall be separately accounted for according to their source and trust purpose. Funds shall not be deposited in the Coastal Program Account without the Department of Finance’s approval.

(d) (1) There is in the Coastal Trust Fund the California Climate Resilience Account. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, and except as provided in paragraph (6), funds in the account are continuously appropriated to the conservancy, as follows, without regard to fiscal year. Funds shall be expended by the conservancy, the California Coastal Commission, and the San Francisco Bay Conservation and
 Development Commission for coastal zone management planning and implementation activities to address the risks and impacts of climate change, sea level rise, and associated extreme events to coastal and bay communities and natural resources. The purpose of the account is to support project implementation, capital outlay, and local assistance grants. Up to 10 percent of the funds shall be available for administrative costs.

(2) Except as specified by an instrument imposing conditions on the use or expenditure of the specific funds provided, funds appropriated for these purposes shall be allocated as follows:

(A) To the California Coastal Commission, 20 percent of the funds deposited in the account during each fiscal year.

(B) To the San Francisco Bay Conservation and Development Commission, 20 percent of the funds
 deposited in the account during each fiscal year.

(C) To the conservancy, 60 percent of the funds deposited in the account during each fiscal year.

(3) Funds in the account shall be expended solely for their specified purposes.

(4) Funds that may be deposited into the California Climate Resilience Account include, but are not limited to, appropriations and grants, funds from the federal government, regional planning agencies, and local governments, fees, litigation settlements, permits, and mitigation requirements, and private donations that are eligible to be spent for the purposes of the account.

(5) Nothing in this section shall apply to funds eligible for deposit in the Bay Fill Clean-Up and Abatement Fund pursuant to Section 66647 of the Government
 Code or to any funds collected pursuant to the California Coastal Act of 1976 (Division 20 (commencing with Section 30000)).

(6) To the extent that any funds are appropriated into the account by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act, those funds shall be segregated for purposes of accounting. Funds appropriated into the account by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act shall not be continuously appropriated and are subject to the provisions of Section 16304 of the Government Code.

(e) Interest that accrues on funds in the Coastal Trust Fund shall be retained in the Coastal Trust Fund and available for expenditure by the conservancy for the trust purposes.

(f) The conservancy shall maintain separate accountings of funds within the Coastal Trust Fund, pursuant to its fiduciary duties, for the purpose of separating
 deposits and interest on those deposits, according to their trust purposes.

(g) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, and except as provided in subdivision (d), all funds in the Coastal Trust Fund are continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal year, to the conservancy to fulfill the trust purposes for which the payments of funds were made.

(h) The conservancy shall provide an annual accounting to the Department of Finance of the conservancy’s expenditures from, and other activities related to, the Coastal Trust Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 35, Sec. 148.   (SB 861)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

31013.

“Nonprofit organization” means any private, nonprofit organization that qualifies under Section 501(c)(3) of the United States Internal Revenue Code of 1986.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 469, Sec. 8.   (SB 785)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

31014.

“Bay plan” means the San Francisco Bay Plan as adopted by the bay commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 967, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

31015.

“Suisun Marsh Protection Plan” means the plan approved as provided in Division 19 (commencing with Section 29000).

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 967, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

31016.

“Local plan” means any land use plan of a local public agency, port district, regional park or open-space district, or recreation and park district whose jurisdiction is included, in whole or in part, within the jurisdiction of the conservancy within San Francisco Bay in the areas described in Section 31006.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 967, Sec. 4.5.)
-------------------------------------------

31017.

“Public agency” includes, but is not limited to, local public agencies, state agencies, federal agencies, colleges and universities, intergovernmental bodies, and federally recognized Indian tribes.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 958, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Declaration of State Policy and General Provisions [31050. - 31056.]

31050.

The Legislature finds and declares that the agricultural lands located within the coastal zone contribute substantially to the state and national food supply and are a vital part of the state’s economy.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1441.)
-------------------------------------------

31051.

The Legislature further finds and declares that agricultural lands located within the coastal zone should be protected from intrusion of nonagricultural uses, except where conversion to urban or other uses is in the long-term public interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1441.)
-------------------------------------------

31052.

The Legislature further finds and declares that lands within the coastal zone, principally in rural areas, are vacant or improperly utilized because of inadequate circulation patterns, poor lot layout, scattered ownerships, lack of recreation and open space, and other conditions which adversely affect the coastal environment and reduce opportunities for orderly development.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1441.)
-------------------------------------------

31053.

The Legislature further finds and declares that important fish and wildlife habitat, natural areas, and scenic and environmental resources within the coastal zone have been degraded due to indiscriminate dredging, filling, and the intrusion of incompatible land uses.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1441.)
-------------------------------------------

31054.

It is the policy of the state and the intent of the Legislature to provide for the State Coastal Conservancy, which should report to the Governor and to the Legislature, with responsibility for implementing a program of agricultural protection, area restoration, and resource enhancement in the coastal zone within policies and guidelines established pursuant to Division 20 (commencing with Section 30000).

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1441.)
-------------------------------------------

31055.

No funds may be expended or granted under this division, unless and until such funds are appropriated by the Legislature.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1441.)
-------------------------------------------

31056.

(a) The conservancy is not required to provide funding for projects within the San Francisco Bay in the areas described in Section 31006, until the Legislature appropriates funds for such purposes.

The conservancy shall expend funds specifically identified for the San Francisco Bay, whether from public or private sources, in the San Francisco Bay.

(b) The bay commission may annually prepare and adopt a list of priority areas and concerns which are essential to the orderly implementation of the bay plan and the Suisun Marsh Protection Plan. The priority list shall provide guidance to the conservancy in its selection of San Francisco Bay projects.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 967, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Establishment and Functions of the State Coastal Conservancy [31100. - 31123.]

31100.

There is in the Resources Agency the State Coastal Conservancy, consisting of the following seven members:

(a) The chairperson of the commission.

(b) The Secretary of the Resources Agency.

(c) The Director of Finance.

(d) Four members of the public, of which two shall be appointed by the Governor, one shall be appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules, and one shall be appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly. Of the members appointed by the Governor, not more than one may be an elected official of a local government, and the official shall have been elected to an office in a local government whose territory is located wholly or partially in the coastal zone.

Except for members appointed pursuant to subdivision (d), the members of the conservancy may designate one of their employees to serve on the conservancy in their absence.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1224, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

31100.5.

Three Members of the Senate, appointed by the Senate Rules Committee, and three Members of the Assembly, appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly, shall meet with the conservancy and participate in its activities to the extent that such participation is not incompatible with their respective positions as Members of the Legislature.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 930.)
-------------------------------------------

31101.
